Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.270

Exempt commissions—Marketing agreements and orders.

This chapter does not apply to any provision of the statutes of the state of Washington relating to the Washington apple commission (chapter 15.24 RCW), to the soft tree fruits commission (chapter 15.28 RCW), to the dairy products commission (chapter 15.44 RCW), or to the Washington grain commission (chapter 15.115 RCW). Marketing agreements or orders shall not be issued with respect to apples, soft tree fruits, dairy products, or wheat or barley for the purposes specified in RCW 15.66.030 (1) or (2).

[ 2009 c 33 s 35; 2007 c 234 s 100; 1961 c 11 s 15.66.270. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 27.]